New York, session 2025-2026, S7449.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 607 to read as follows: 3 § 607. Reports required by insurance companies. Any insurance company 4 which receives an accident report pursuant to this chapter, in a city 5 having a population of one million or more, shall provide the department 6 of transportation of such city with statistics and other relevant infor- 7 mation related to motor vehicle accidents occurring within such city. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, 9 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 10 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 11 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08036-01-5